Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3607
Nebraska Development
Network Program; created; Department of Economic Development; powers
and duties.

The Nebraska Development Network Program
is created in the Department
of Economic Development. The department shall administer the program
and may contract for services to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Development
Network Program.

Laws 1998, LB 1053, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 48, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 20.